Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-20,111
Attorney General; powers to ensure compliance.

The Attorney General shall have the authority to ensure compliance with commitments which inure to the public interest.

Laws 1996, LB 1188, § 10.